Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB88.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 323. Money collected from oil or gas leases under publicly owned streambeds.(a) Money collected beginning January 1, 2014.--The department shall estimate the amount of money collected by the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 department beginning January 1, 2014, and ending on the effective date of this subsection, from an oil or gas lease under a publicly owned streambed in each county where such a streambed is located. No later than 60 days from the effective date of this subsection, the department shall distribute an amount of money equal to the estimated amount of money collected by the department beginning January 1, 2014, and ending on the effective date of this subsection, in a single lump-sum payment to each county specified under this subsection.(b) Money collected after effective date of subsection.--The department shall distribute the money collected by the department after the effective date of this subsection from an oil or gas lease under a publicly owned streambed to the county where the streambed is located.(c) Use of money.--A county that is the recipient of money under this section shall use the money solely for the purpose of maintaining creeks and streams within the county at the county's discretion.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0088PN0071 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819